Washington statutes.
RCW 35.44.020

Assessment district—Cost items to be included.

There shall be included in the cost and expense of every local improvement for assessment against the property in the district created to pay the same, or any part thereof:

(1) The cost of all of the construction or improvement authorized for the district including, but not limited to, that portion of the improvement within the street intersections;

(2) The estimated cost and expense of all engineering and surveying necessary for the improvement done under the supervision of the city or town engineer;

(3) The estimated cost and expense of ascertaining the ownership of the lots or parcels of land included in the assessment district;

(4) The estimated cost and expense of advertising, mailing, and publishing all necessary notices;

(5) The estimated cost and expense of accounting, clerical labor, and of books and blanks extended or used on the part of the city or town clerk and city or town treasurer in connection with the improvement;

(6) All cost of the acquisition of rights-of-way, property, easements, or other facilities or rights, including without limitation rights to use property, facilities, or other improvements appurtenant, related to, and/or useful in connection with the local improvement, whether by eminent domain, purchase, gift, payment of connection charges, capacity charges, or other similar charges or in any other manner;

(7) The cost for legal, financial, and appraisal services and any other expenses incurred by the city, town, or public corporation for the district or in the formation thereof, or by the city, town, or public corporation in connection with such construction or improvement and in the financing thereof, including the issuance of any bonds and the cost of providing for increases in the local improvement guaranty fund, or providing for a separate reserve fund or other security for the payment of principal of and interest on such bonds.

Any of the costs set forth in this section may be excluded from the cost and expense to be assessed against the property in such local improvement district and may be paid from any other moneys available therefor if the legislative body of the city or town so designates by ordinance at any time.

[ 1995 c 382 s 1; 1987 c 242 s 4; 1985 c 397 s 4; 1971 ex.s. c 116 s 8; 1969 ex.s. c 258 s 6; 1965 c 7 s 35.44.020. Prior: 1955 c 364 s 1; 1911 c 98 s 55; RRS s 9408.]

NOTES:

Policy—1987 c 242: See note following RCW 35.43.005.

Authority supplemental—1985 c 397: See RCW 35.51.900.